Wisconsin, session 2025, AB942.
do enact as follows:AB942,13Section 1. 5.25 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB942,2,815.25 (3) (c) After an election and more than 30 days before the next election, 2the location of a polling place in a municipality may not be discontinued without the 3approval of the municipality’s governing body after a public hearing at which the 4public has an opportunity to present testimony on the proposed discontinuation. If 5the location of a polling place is discontinued after an election, the municipal clerk 6or board of election commissioners shall, no later than 30 days before the next 7election, provide notice of that change by mail to each residence in the area served 8by the polling place.AB942,2,99